Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201076-2228
Appraisers;
classification.

There shall be five classes of credentials issued
to real property appraisers as follows:

(1) Trainee real property appraiser, which classification
shall consist of those persons who meet the requirements set forth in section
76-2228.01;

(2) Registered real property appraiser, which classification
shall consist of those persons who meet the requirements set forth in section
76-2229.01;

(3) Licensed residential real
property appraiser, which classification shall consist of those persons who
meet the requirements set forth in section 76-2230;

(4) Certified residential real property appraiser, which
classification shall consist of those persons who meet the requirements set
forth in section 76-2231.01; and

(5) Certified general real property appraiser, which classification
shall consist of those persons who meet the requirements set forth in section
76-2232.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 28;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 29;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 24;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 19;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 48;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 11;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 7;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 9.